Illinois, session 104th, HB1098.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 10-1-7.1 and 10-2.1-6.3 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/10-1-7.1)7    Sec. 10-1-7.1. Original appointments; full-time fire 8department.9    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 10the provisions of Section 10-1-7.2, this Section shall apply 11to all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 12department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 13be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 14years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 1597-251).16    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 17to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 18department to which this Section applies shall be administered 19in the manner provided for in this Section. Provisions of the 20Illinois Municipal Code, municipal ordinances, and rules 21adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 22initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 23continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this   HB1098- 2 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 2and any other law, this Section shall control.3    A home rule or non-home rule municipality may not 4administer its fire department process for original 5appointments in a manner that is less stringent than this 6Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 7Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 8concurrent exercise by home rule units of the powers and 9functions exercised by the State.10    A municipality that is operating under a court order or 11consent decree regarding original appointments to a full-time 12fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective date of 13Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of this 14Section for the duration of the court order or consent decree. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 16(a), this Section does not apply to a municipality with more 17than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 18    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 19to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 20eligibles established in accordance with the processes 21established by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed 22the performance standards required by this Section shall be 23placed on a register of eligibles for original appointment to 24an affected fire department.25    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 26a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a   HB1098- 3 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 2position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 3death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 4any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 5that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 6eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 7conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 8minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 9authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 10the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 11the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 12either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 13register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 14highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 15of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 16eligibles is less than 5 people.17    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 18losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 19candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 20by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 21not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 22future examinations, including an examination held during the 23time a candidate is already on the municipality's register of 24eligibles.25    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 26shall be vested in the Civil Service Commission. All   HB1098- 4 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1certificates of appointment issued to any officer or member of 2an affected department shall be signed by the chairperson and 3secretary, respectively, of the commission upon appointment of 4such officer or member to the affected department by the 5commission. After being selected from the register of 6eligibles to fill a vacancy in the affected department, each 7appointee shall be presented with his or her certificate of 8appointment on the day on which he or she is sworn in as a 9classified member of the affected department. Firefighters who 10were not issued a certificate of appointment when originally 11appointed shall be provided with a certificate within 10 days 12after making a written request to the chairperson of the Civil 13Service Commission. Each person who accepts a certificate of 14appointment and successfully completes his or her probationary 15period shall be enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular 16member of the fire department.17    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 18person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 19effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 20department or fire protection district or employed by a State 21university and sworn or commissioned to perform firefighter 22duties or paramedic duties, or both, except that the following 23persons are not included: part-time firefighters; auxiliary, 24reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including paid-on-call 25firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other civilian 26employees of a fire department or fire protection district who   HB1098- 5 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1are not routinely expected to perform firefighter duties; and 2elected officials.3    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 4The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 5identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 6aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 7of members of the fire department in order to provide the 8highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 9applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 10department shall be subject to examination and testing which 11shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 12unless the municipality shall by ordinance limit applicants to 13residents of the municipality, county or counties in which the 14municipality is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 15testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 16Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 17and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 18Municipalities may establish educational, emergency medical 19service licensure, and other prerequisites for participation 20in an examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any 21municipality may charge a fee to cover the costs of the 22application process.23    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 24enters the fire service of a municipality cannot be made more 25restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 26service for that municipality, or be made a condition of   HB1098- 6 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 2for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 3of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 4the Fire Department Promotion Act.5    No person who is 35 years of age or older shall be eligible 6to take an examination for a position as a firefighter unless 7the person has had previous employment status as a firefighter 8in the regularly constituted fire department of the 9municipality, except as provided in this Section. The age 10limitation does not apply to:11        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 12    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 13    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 14    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 15    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 16    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 17    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 18    protection district,19        (2) any person who has served a municipality as a 20    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time 21    firefighter, or22        (3) any person who turned 35 while serving as a member 23    of the active or reserve components of any of the branches 24    of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National 25    Guard of any state, whose service was characterized as 26    honorable or under honorable, if separated from the   HB1098- 7 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    military, and is currently under the age of 40. 2    No person who is under 18 21 years of age shall be eligible 3for employment as a firefighter.4    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 5political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 6examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 7municipality or their designees and agents.8    No municipality shall require that any firefighter 9appointed to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment 10period of longer than one year of actual active employment, 11which may exclude periods of training, or injury or illness 12leaves, including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar 13days. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 14Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 15extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 16employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 17sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 18hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 19licensure.20    In the event that any applicant who has been found 21eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 22the final eligibility register provided for in this Division 1 23has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 24year after the date of his or her physical ability 25examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 26be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or   HB1098- 8 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 2physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 3than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 4commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 5applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 6candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 7certification and appointment that applicant may be again 8examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 9ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 10standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 11shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 12removed from the register.13    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 14the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 15subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 16given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 17preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 18published in the municipality, or if no newspaper is published 19therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 20circulation within the municipality, or (ii) on the 21municipality's Internet website. Additional notice of the 22examination may be given as the commission shall prescribe.23    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 24firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 25ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 26aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall   HB1098- 9 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 2the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 3include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 4determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 5be made available to the public.6    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 7least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 8education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 9Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 10upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 11in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 12capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 13performed by members of a fire department. Written 14examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 15the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.16    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 17undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 18the essential functions included in the duties they may be 19called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 20the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 21are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 22called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 23frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 24department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 25in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 26for testing. These physical examinations shall be open,   HB1098- 10 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 2each applicant's physical abilities in the following 3dimensions:4        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 5    that may be required in the performance of duties 6    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 7    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 8    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 9    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 10    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 11    local appointing authority.12        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 13    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 14    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 15    environments.16        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 17    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 18    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 19    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 20    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.21    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 22capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 23industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 24approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 25of the State Fire Marshal.26    Physical ability examinations administered under this   HB1098- 11 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 2proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 3reasonable regulations of the commission.4    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 5authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 6person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 7passage of the written examination or the passage of the 8written examination and the physical ability component. 9Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 10score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 11the commission so as to demonstrate a candidate's ability to 12perform the essential functions of the job. The minimum score 13set by the commission shall be supported by appropriate 14validation evidence and shall comply with all applicable State 15and federal laws. The appointing authority may conduct the 16physical ability component and any subjective components 17subsequent to the posting of the preliminary eligibility 18register.19    The examination components for an initial eligibility 20register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 21position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 22the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 23successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 24the person's results on any subjective component as described 25in subsection (d). 26    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility   HB1098- 12 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 2before any applicable preference points or subjective points 3are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score set by the 4commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 5score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 6register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 7score set by the commission.8    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 9persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 10for passage and who have passed the physical ability 11examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 12as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 13on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 14aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 15the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 16than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 17list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 18the final grades of the candidates without reference to 19priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 20preference credit.21    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 22without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 23register is established and before it expires with the 24candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 25examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 26initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission   HB1098- 13 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 2to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 3preference credit.4    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:5        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 6    the military service of the United States for a period of 7    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 8    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 9    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 10    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 11    employment with the fire department of an affected 12    department.13        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 14    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 15    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 16    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 17    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 18    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 19    employment with the fire department.20        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have 21    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 22    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 23    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 24    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 25    the fire department.26        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a   HB1098- 14 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    license as a paramedic may be preferred for appointment to 2    and employment with the fire department of an affected 3    department providing emergency medical services.4        (5) Experience preference. All persons employed by a 5    municipality who have been paid-on-call or part-time 6    certified Firefighter II, certified Firefighter III, State 7    of Illinois or nationally licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 8    paramedic, or any combination of those capacities may be 9    awarded up to a maximum of 5 points. However, the 10    applicant may not be awarded more than 0.5 points for each 11    complete year of paid-on-call or part-time service. 12    Applicants from outside the municipality who were employed 13    as full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a 14    fire protection district or another municipality may be 15    awarded up to 5 experience preference points. However, the 16    applicant may not be awarded more than one point for each 17    complete year of full-time service.18        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 19    the municipality or in the case of applicants from outside 20    the municipality the governing body of any fire protection 21    district or any other municipality shall certify to the 22    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 23    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 24    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 25    receive the full amount of preference points under this 26    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the   HB1098- 15 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 2    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 3    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 4    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 5    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 6    based on the totals received if all points under this 7    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 8    list shall be determined by lot. 9        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 10    residence is located within the fire department's 11    jurisdiction may be preferred for appointment to and 12    employment with the fire department.13        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 14    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 15    based on an applicant's experience or background as 16    identified by the commission.17        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 18    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 19    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 20    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter 21    specified in this Section may be awarded up to 20 22    preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 23    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 24    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 25    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 26    suppression work must be in accordance with Section   HB1098- 16 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    10-1-14 of this Division and the terms established by a 2    Joint Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 3    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 4    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 5    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 6    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 7    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 8    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 9    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 10    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 11    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 12    components of the examination. 13        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission shall give 14    preference for original appointment to persons designated 15    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive 16    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 17    commission may give preference for original appointment to 18    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 19    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 20    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The 21    commission shall determine the number of preference points 22    for each category, except items (1) and (7.5). The number 23    of preference points for each category shall range from 0 24    to 5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 25    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 26    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points   HB1098- 17 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 2    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 3    preference for original appointment to persons designated 4    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 5    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 6    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 7    applied by the commission in determining the final 8    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 9    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 10    total number of preference points awarded under this 11    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 12    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 13    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 14    addition to other preference points awarded by the 15    commission. 16    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 17claim the credit before any examination held under the 18provisions of this Section, but the preference shall be given 19after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 20list or register at the request of a person entitled to a 21credit before any certification or appointments are made from 22the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 23evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 24who are eligible for preference credit shall make a claim in 25writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 26eligibility list, or the claim shall be deemed waived. Final   HB1098- 18 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1eligibility registers shall be established after the awarding 2of verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 3credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 4eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 5upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 6the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 7eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 8employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 9background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 10history, employment history, moral character, oral 11examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 12on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 13examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 14after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.15    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the 16age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 17shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 18abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 19of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 35 years 20shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise 21provided in this Section.22    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 23for original appointment after the names have been on the list 24for more than 2 years.25    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 26fire department unless he or she is a person of good character;   HB1098- 19 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 2convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 3However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 4the fire department because of the person's record of 5misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 611-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 712-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 831-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 9(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 10Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 11for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 12is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 13violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 14provided.15    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who 16is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 17fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 18furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 19Bureau of Investigation by the commission.20    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to 21consider some aspect of criminal history record information 22for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 23responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 24conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 25Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 26Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish,   HB1098- 20 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 2in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.3    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 4of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 5prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 6commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 7only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 8of this Division, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 9appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 10any calendar year.11    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 12questions or answers before a written examination, or 13otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 14this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 15subject to charges for official misconduct.16    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 17in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 18examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 19was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 20disciplinary actions.21(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 22102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 235-13-22.) 24    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-6.3)25    Sec. 10-2.1-6.3. Original appointments; full-time fire   HB1098- 21 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1department.2    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 3the provisions of Section 10-2.1-6.4, this Section shall apply 4to all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 5department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 6be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 7years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 897-251).9    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 10to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 11department to which this Section applies shall be administered 12in the manner provided for in this Section. Provisions of the 13Illinois Municipal Code, municipal ordinances, and rules 14adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 15initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 16continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this 17Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 18and any other law, this Section shall control.19    A home rule or non-home rule municipality may not 20administer its fire department process for original 21appointments in a manner that is less stringent than this 22Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 23Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 24concurrent exercise by home rule units of the powers and 25functions exercised by the State.26    A municipality that is operating under a court order or   HB1098- 22 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1consent decree regarding original appointments to a full-time 2fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective date of 3Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of this 4Section for the duration of the court order or consent decree.5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 6(a), this Section does not apply to a municipality with more 7than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 8    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 9to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 10eligibles established in accordance with the processes 11established by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed 12the performance standards required by this Section shall be 13placed on a register of eligibles for original appointment to 14an affected fire department.15    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 16a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a 17firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 18position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 19death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 20any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 21that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 22eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 23conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 24minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 25authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 26the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has   HB1098- 23 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 2either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 3register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 4highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 5of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 6eligibles is less than 5 people.7    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 8losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 9candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 10by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 11not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 12future examinations, including an examination held during the 13time a candidate is already on the municipality's register of 14eligibles.15    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 16shall be vested in the board of fire and police commissioners. 17All certificates of appointment issued to any officer or 18member of an affected department shall be signed by the 19chairperson and secretary, respectively, of the board upon 20appointment of such officer or member to the affected 21department by action of the board. After being selected from 22the register of eligibles to fill a vacancy in the affected 23department, each appointee shall be presented with his or her 24certificate of appointment on the day on which he or she is 25sworn in as a classified member of the affected department. 26Firefighters who were not issued a certificate of appointment   HB1098- 24 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1when originally appointed shall be provided with a certificate 2within 10 days after making a written request to the 3chairperson of the board of fire and police commissioners. 4Each person who accepts a certificate of appointment and 5successfully completes his or her probationary period shall be 6enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular member of the fire 7department.8    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 9person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 10effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 11department or fire protection district or employed by a State 12university and sworn or commissioned to perform firefighter 13duties or paramedic duties, or both, except that the following 14persons are not included: part-time firefighters; auxiliary, 15reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including paid-on-call 16firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other civilian 17employees of a fire department or fire protection district who 18are not routinely expected to perform firefighter duties; and 19elected officials.20    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 21The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 22identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 23aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 24of members of the fire department in order to provide the 25highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 26applicants for original appointment to an affected fire   HB1098- 25 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1department shall be subject to examination and testing which 2shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 3unless the municipality shall by ordinance limit applicants to 4residents of the municipality, county or counties in which the 5municipality is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 6testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 7Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 8and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 9Municipalities may establish educational, emergency medical 10service licensure, and other prerequisites for participation 11in an examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any 12municipality may charge a fee to cover the costs of the 13application process.14    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 15enters the fire service of a municipality cannot be made more 16restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 17service for that municipality, or be made a condition of 18promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 19for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 20of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 21the Fire Department Promotion Act.22    No person who is 35 years of age or older shall be eligible 23to take an examination for a position as a firefighter unless 24the person has had previous employment status as a firefighter 25in the regularly constituted fire department of the 26municipality, except as provided in this Section. The age   HB1098- 26 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1limitation does not apply to:2        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 3    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 4    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 5    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 6    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 7    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 8    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 9    protection district,10        (2) any person who has served a municipality as a 11    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time 12    firefighter, or13        (3) any person who turned 35 while serving as a member 14    of the active or reserve components of any of the branches 15    of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National 16    Guard of any state, whose service was characterized as 17    honorable or under honorable, if separated from the 18    military, and is currently under the age of 40. 19    No person who is under 18 21 years of age shall be eligible 20for employment as a firefighter.21    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 22political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 23examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 24municipality or their designees and agents.25    No municipality shall require that any firefighter 26appointed to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment   HB1098- 27 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1period of longer than one year of actual active employment, 2which may exclude periods of training, or injury or illness 3leaves, including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar 4days. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 5Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 6extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 7employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 8sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 9hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 10licensure.11    In the event that any applicant who has been found 12eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 13the final eligibility register provided for in this Section 14has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 15year after the date of his or her physical ability 16examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 17be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or 18her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 19physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 20than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 21commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 22applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 23candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 24certification and appointment that applicant may be again 25examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 26ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum   HB1098- 28 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 2shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 3removed from the register.4    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 5the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 6subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 7given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 8preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 9published in the municipality, or if no newspaper is published 10therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 11circulation within the municipality, or (ii) on the 12municipality's Internet website. Additional notice of the 13examination may be given as the commission shall prescribe.14    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 15firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 16ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 17aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall 18determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 19the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 20include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 21determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 22be made available to the public.23    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 24least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 25education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 26Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based   HB1098- 29 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 2in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 3capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 4performed by members of a fire department. Written 5examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 6the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.7    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 8undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 9the essential functions included in the duties they may be 10called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 11the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 12are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 13called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 14frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 15department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 16in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 17for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 18competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 19each applicant's physical abilities in the following 20dimensions:21        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 22    that may be required in the performance of duties 23    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 24    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 25    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 26    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested   HB1098- 30 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 2    local appointing authority.3        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 4    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 5    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 6    environments.7        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 8    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 9    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 10    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 11    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.12    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 13capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 14industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 15approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 16of the State Fire Marshal. 17    Physical ability examinations administered under this 18Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 19proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 20reasonable regulations of the commission.21    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 22authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 23person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 24passage of the written examination or the passage of the 25written examination and the physical ability component. 26Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum   HB1098- 31 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 2the commission so as to demonstrate a candidate's ability to 3perform the essential functions of the job. The minimum score 4set by the commission shall be supported by appropriate 5validation evidence and shall comply with all applicable State 6and federal laws. The appointing authority may conduct the 7physical ability component and any subjective components 8subsequent to the posting of the preliminary eligibility 9register.10    The examination components for an initial eligibility 11register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 12position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 13the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 14successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 15the person's results on any subjective component as described 16in subsection (d). 17    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 18register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 19before any applicable preference points or subjective points 20are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score as set by 21the commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe 22the score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 23register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 24score set by the commission.25    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 26persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score   HB1098- 32 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1for passage and who have passed the physical ability 2examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 3as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 4on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 5aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 6the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 7than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 8list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 9the final grades of the candidates without reference to 10priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 11preference credit.12    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 13without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 14register is established and before it expires with the 15candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 16examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 17initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission 18showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 19to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 20preference credit.21    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:22        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 23    the military service of the United States for a period of 24    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 25    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 26    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval   HB1098- 33 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 2    employment with the fire department of an affected 3    department.4        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 5    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 6    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 7    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 8    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 9    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 10    employment with the fire department.11        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have 12    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 13    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 14    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 15    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 16    the fire department.17        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a 18    license as a paramedic shall be preferred for appointment 19    to and employment with the fire department of an affected 20    department providing emergency medical services.21        (5) Experience preference. All persons employed by a 22    municipality who have been paid-on-call or part-time 23    certified Firefighter II, State of Illinois or nationally 24    licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or any combination of those 25    capacities shall be awarded 0.5 point for each year of 26    successful service in one or more of those capacities, up   HB1098- 34 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    to a maximum of 5 points. Certified Firefighter III and 2    State of Illinois or nationally licensed paramedics shall 3    be awarded one point per year up to a maximum of 5 points. 4    Applicants from outside the municipality who were employed 5    as full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a 6    fire protection district or another municipality for at 7    least 2 years shall be awarded 5 experience preference 8    points. These additional points presuppose a rating scale 9    totaling 100 points available for the eligibility list. If 10    more or fewer points are used in the rating scale for the 11    eligibility list, the points awarded under this subsection 12    shall be increased or decreased by a factor equal to the 13    total possible points available for the examination 14    divided by 100.15        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 16    the municipality or in the case of applicants from outside 17    the municipality the governing body of any fire protection 18    district or any other municipality shall certify to the 19    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 20    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 21    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 22    receive the full amount of preference points under this 23    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 24    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 25    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 26    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due   HB1098- 35 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 2    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 3    based on the totals received if all points under this 4    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 5    list shall be determined by lot. 6        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 7    residence is located within the fire department's 8    jurisdiction shall be preferred for appointment to and 9    employment with the fire department.10        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 11    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 12    based on an applicant's experience or background as 13    identified by the commission.14        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 15    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 16    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 17    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter 18    specified in this Section is eligible to be awarded up to 19    20 preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 20    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 21    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 22    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 23    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 24    10-2.1-4 of this Division and the terms established by a 25    Joint Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 26    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its   HB1098- 36 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 2    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 3    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 4    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 5    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 6    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 7    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 8    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 9    components of the examination. 10        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission may give 11    preference for original appointment to persons designated 12    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive 13    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 14    commission may give preference for original appointment to 15    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 16    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 17    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The 18    commission shall determine the number of preference points 19    for each category, except items (1) and (7.5). The number 20    of preference points for each category shall range from 0 21    to 5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 22    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 23    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 24    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 25    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 26    preference for original appointment to persons designated   HB1098- 37 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 2    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 3    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 4    applied by the commission in determining the final 5    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 6    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 7    total number of preference points awarded under this 8    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 9    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 10    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 11    addition to other preference points awarded by the 12    commission. 13    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 14claim the credit before any examination held under the 15provisions of this Section, but the preference may be given 16after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 17list or register at the request of a person entitled to a 18credit before any certification or appointments are made from 19the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 20evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 21who are eligible for preference credit may make a claim in 22writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 23eligibility list, or the claim may be deemed waived. Final 24eligibility registers may be established after the awarding of 25verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 26credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final   HB1098- 38 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 2upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 3the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 4eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 5employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 6background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 7history, employment history, moral character, oral 8examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 9on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 10examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 11after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.12    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the 13age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 14shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 15abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 16of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 35 years 17shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise 18provided in this Section.19    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 20for original appointment after the names have been on the list 21for more than 2 years.22    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 23fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 24not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 25convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 26However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to   HB1098- 39 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1the fire department because of the person's record of 2misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 311-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 412-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 531-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 6(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 7Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 8for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 9is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 10violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 11provided.12    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who 13is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 14fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 15furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 16Bureau of Investigation by the commission.17    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to 18consider some aspect of criminal history record information 19for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 20responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 21conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 22Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 23Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 24pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 25in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.26    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage   HB1098- 40 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 2prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 3commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 4only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 5of this Division, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 6appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 7any calendar year.8    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 9questions or answers before a written examination, or 10otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 11this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 12subject to charges for official misconduct.13    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 14in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 15examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 16was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 17disciplinary actions.18(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 19102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 205-13-22.) 21    Section 10. The Fire Protection District Act is amended by 22changing Section 16.06b as follows: 23    (70 ILCS 705/16.06b)24    Sec. 16.06b. Original appointments; full-time fire   HB1098- 41 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1department.2    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 3the provisions of Section 16.06c, this Section shall apply to 4all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 5department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 6be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 7years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 897-251).9    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 10to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 11department to which this Section applies shall be administered 12in a no less stringent manner than the manner provided for in 13this Section. Provisions of the Illinois Municipal Code, Fire 14Protection District Act, fire district ordinances, and rules 15adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 16initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 17continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this 18Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 19and any other law, this Section shall control.20    A fire protection district that is operating under a court 21order or consent decree regarding original appointments to a 22full-time fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective 23date of Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of 24this Section for the duration of the court order or consent 25decree.26    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made   HB1098- 42 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 2eligibles established in accordance with the processes 3required by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed the 4performance standards required by the Section shall be placed 5on a register of eligibles for original appointment to an 6affected fire department.7    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 8a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a 9firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 10position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 11death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 12any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 13that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 14eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 15conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 16minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 17authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 18the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 19the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 20either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 21register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 22highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 23of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 24eligibles is less than 5 people.25    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 26losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any   HB1098- 43 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 2by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 3not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 4future examinations, including an examination held during the 5time a candidate is already on the fire district's register of 6eligibles.7    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 8shall be vested in the board of fire commissioners, or board of 9trustees serving in the capacity of a board of fire 10commissioners. All certificates of appointment issued to any 11officer or member of an affected department shall be signed by 12the chairperson and secretary, respectively, of the commission 13upon appointment of such officer or member to the affected 14department by action of the commission. After being selected 15from the register of eligibles to fill a vacancy in the 16affected department, each appointee shall be presented with 17his or her certificate of appointment on the day on which he or 18she is sworn in as a classified member of the affected 19department. Firefighters who were not issued a certificate of 20appointment when originally appointed shall be provided with a 21certificate within 10 days after making a written request to 22the chairperson of the board of fire commissioners, or board 23of trustees serving in the capacity of a board of fire 24commissioners. Each person who accepts a certificate of 25appointment and successfully completes his or her probationary 26period shall be enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular   HB1098- 44 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1member of the fire department.2    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 3person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 4effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 5department or fire protection district or employed by a State 6university and sworn or commissioned to perform firefighter 7duties or paramedic duties, or both, except that the following 8persons are not included: part-time firefighters; auxiliary, 9reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including paid-on-call 10firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other civilian 11employees of a fire department or fire protection district who 12are not routinely expected to perform firefighter duties; and 13elected officials.14    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 15The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 16identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 17aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 18of members of the fire department in order to provide the 19highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 20applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 21department shall be subject to examination and testing which 22shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 23unless the district shall by ordinance limit applicants to 24residents of the district, county or counties in which the 25district is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 26testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this   HB1098- 45 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 2and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 3Districts may establish educational, emergency medical service 4licensure, and other prerequisites for participation in an 5examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any fire protection 6district may charge a fee to cover the costs of the application 7process.8    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 9enters the fire service of a district cannot be made more 10restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 11service for that district, or be made a condition of 12promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 13for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 14of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 15the Fire Department Promotion Act.16    No person who is 35 years of age or older shall be eligible 17to take an examination for a position as a firefighter unless 18the person has had previous employment status as a firefighter 19in the regularly constituted fire department of the district, 20except as provided in this Section. The age limitation does 21not apply to:22        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 23    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 24    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 25    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 26    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section   HB1098- 46 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 2    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 3    protection district;4        (2) any person who has served a fire district as a 5    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time 6    firefighter; or7        (3) any person who turned 35 while serving as a member 8    of the active or reserve components of any of the branches 9    of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National 10    Guard of any state, whose service was characterized as 11    honorable or under honorable, if separated from the 12    military, and is currently under the age of 40. 13    No person who is under 18 21 years of age shall be eligible 14for employment as a firefighter.15    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 16political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 17examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 18district or their designees and agents.19    No district shall require that any firefighter appointed 20to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment period of 21longer than one year of actual active employment, which may 22exclude periods of training, or injury or illness leaves, 23including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar days. 24Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section, the 25probationary employment period limitation may be extended for 26a firefighter who is required, as a condition of employment,   HB1098- 47 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the sole reason 2that a firefighter may be discharged without a hearing is for 3failing to meet the requirements for paramedic licensure.4    In the event that any applicant who has been found 5eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 6the final eligibility register provided for in this Section 7has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 8year after the date of his or her physical ability 9examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 10be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or 11her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 12physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 13than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 14commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 15applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 16candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 17certification and appointment that applicant may be again 18examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 19ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 20standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 21shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 22removed from the register.23    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 24the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 25subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 26given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks   HB1098- 48 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 2published in the district, or if no newspaper is published 3therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 4circulation within the district, or (ii) on the fire 5protection district's Internet website. Additional notice of 6the examination may be given as the commission shall 7prescribe.8    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 9firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 10ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 11aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall 12determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 13the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 14include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 15determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 16be made available to the public.17    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 18least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 19education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 20Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 21upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 22in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 23capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 24performed by members of a fire department. Written 25examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 26the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.  HB1098- 49 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 2undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 3the essential functions included in the duties they may be 4called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 5the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 6are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 7called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 8frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 9department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 10in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 11for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 12competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 13each applicant's physical abilities in the following 14dimensions:15        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 16    that may be required in the performance of duties 17    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 18    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 19    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 20    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 21    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 22    local appointing authority.23        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 24    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 25    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 26    environments.  HB1098- 50 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 2    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 3    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 4    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 5    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.6    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 7capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 8industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 9approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 10of the State Fire Marshal. 11    Physical ability examinations administered under this 12Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 13proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 14reasonable regulations of the commission.15    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 16authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 17person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 18passage of the written examination or the passage of the 19written examination and the physical ability component. 20Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 21score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 22the appointing authorities so as to demonstrate a candidate's 23ability to perform the essential functions of the job. The 24minimum score set by the commission shall be supported by 25appropriate validation evidence and shall comply with all 26applicable State and federal laws. The appointing authority   HB1098- 51 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1may conduct the physical ability component and any subjective 2components subsequent to the posting of the preliminary 3eligibility register.4    The examination components for an initial eligibility 5register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 6position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 7the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 8successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 9the person's results on any subjective component as described 10in subsection (d). 11    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 12register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 13before any applicable preference points or subjective points 14are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score set by the 15commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 16score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 17register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 18score set by the commission.19    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 20persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 21for passage and who have passed the physical ability 22examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 23as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 24on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 25aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 26the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more   HB1098- 52 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 2list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 3the final grades of the candidates without reference to 4priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 5preference credit.6    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 7without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 8register is established and before it expires with the 9candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 10examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 11initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission 12showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 13to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 14preference credit.15    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:16        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 17    the military service of the United States for a period of 18    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 19    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 20    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 21    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 22    employment with the fire department of an affected 23    department.24        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 25    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 26    or cadet training within a cadet program established under   HB1098- 53 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 2    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 3    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 4    employment with the fire department.5        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have 6    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 7    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 8    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 9    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 10    the fire department.11        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a 12    license as a paramedic may be preferred for appointment to 13    and employment with the fire department of an affected 14    department providing emergency medical services.15        (5) Experience preference. All persons employed by a 16    district who have been paid-on-call or part-time certified 17    Firefighter II, certified Firefighter III, State of 18    Illinois or nationally licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 19    paramedic, or any combination of those capacities may be 20    awarded up to a maximum of 5 points. However, the 21    applicant may not be awarded more than 0.5 points for each 22    complete year of paid-on-call or part-time service. 23    Applicants from outside the district who were employed as 24    full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a fire 25    protection district or municipality for at least 2 years 26    may be awarded up to 5 experience preference points.   HB1098- 54 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    However, the applicant may not be awarded more than one 2    point for each complete year of full-time service.3        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 4    the district or in the case of applicants from outside the 5    district the governing body of any other fire protection 6    district or any municipality shall certify to the 7    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 8    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 9    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 10    receive the full amount of preference points under this 11    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 12    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 13    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 14    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 15    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 16    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 17    based on the totals received if all points under this 18    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 19    list shall be determined by lot. 20        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 21    residence is located within the fire department's 22    jurisdiction may be preferred for appointment to and 23    employment with the fire department.24        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 25    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 26    based on an applicant's experience or background as   HB1098- 55 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    identified by the commission.2        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 3    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 4    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 5    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter 6    specified in this Section is eligible to be awarded up to 7    20 preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 8    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 9    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 10    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 11    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 16.06 12    of this Act and the terms established by a Joint 13    Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 14    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 15    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 16    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 17    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 18    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 19    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 20    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 21    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 22    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 23    components of the examination. 24        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission shall give 25    preference for original appointment to persons designated 26    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive   HB1098- 56 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 2    commission may give preference for original appointment to 3    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 4    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 5    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The 6    commission shall determine the number of preference points 7    for each category, except (1) and (7.5). The number of 8    preference points for each category shall range from 0 to 9    5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 10    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 11    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 12    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 13    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 14    preference for original appointment to persons designated 15    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 16    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 17    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 18    applied by the commission in determining the final 19    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 20    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 21    total number of preference points awarded under this 22    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 23    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 24    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 25    addition to other preference points awarded by the 26    commission.   HB1098- 57 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 2claim the credit before any examination held under the 3provisions of this Section, but the preference shall be given 4after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 5list or register at the request of a person entitled to a 6credit before any certification or appointments are made from 7the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 8evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 9who are eligible for preference credit shall make a claim in 10writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 11eligibility list, or the claim shall be deemed waived. Final 12eligibility registers shall be established after the awarding 13of verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 14credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 15eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 16upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 17the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 18eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 19employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 20background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 21history, employment history, moral character, oral 22examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 23on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 24examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 25after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.26    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the   HB1098- 58 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 2shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 3abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 4of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 35 years 5shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise 6provided in this Section.7    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 8for original appointment after the names have been on the list 9for more than 2 years.10    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 11fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 12not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 13convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 14However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 15the fire department because of the person's record of 16misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 1711-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 1812-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 1931-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 20(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 21Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 22for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 23is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 24violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 25provided.26    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who   HB1098- 59 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 2fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 3furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 4Bureau of Investigation by the commission.5    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to 6consider some aspect of criminal history record information 7for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 8responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 9conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 10Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 11Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 12pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 13in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.14    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 15of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 16prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 17commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 18only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 19of this Section, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 20appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 21any calendar year.22    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 23questions or answers before a written examination, or 24otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 25this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 26subject to charges for official misconduct.  HB1098- 60 -LRB104 04060 RTM 14084 b1    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 2in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 3examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 4was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 5disciplinary actions.6(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 7102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 85-13-22.)